Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 2. Public Restrooms.

Administrative Code. —

For public toilets, showers, and laundromats, see 18 AAC 30, art. 6.

For sanitation and physical facilities, see 18 AAC 31, art. 5.

Collateral references. —

39 Am. Jur. 2d, Health, § 50 et seq.

40 Am. Jur. 2d, Hotels, Motels and Restaurants, §§ 9 — 12, 25 — 40.

39A C.J.S., Health and Environment, §§ 3, 5 — 8, 20, 21, 26, 27, 47.

43A C.J.S., Inns, Hotels, and Eating Places, §§ 1 — 11, 20.

Validity of statutes, ordinances, and regulations requiring the installation or maintenance of various bathroom facilities in dwelling units. 79 ALR3d 716.

Sec. 18.35.100.
Toilet facilities required in restaurants and taverns.

[Repealed, § 45 ch 59 SLA 1982.]

An owner of a restaurant or tavern shall provide and maintain sanitary toilet accommodations for public use.

History.

(§ 1 ch 58 SLA 1974; am § 1 ch 175 SLA 1975; am § 1 ch 78 SLA 1976; am § 45 ch 59 SLA 1982)

Administrative Code. —

For sanitation and physical facilities, see 18 AAC 31, art. 5.

Sec. 18.35.110.
Penalty for violations of AS 18.35.100.

A person who fails to comply with AS

18.35.100

is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction is punishable by a fine of not more than $500. Each operating restaurant or tavern in violation constitutes a separate offense.

In addition to the penalty provided in (a) of this section, the court shall require the person to comply with AS

18.35.100

within a reasonable period of time.

History.

(§ 1 ch 58 SLA 1974)

Sec. 18.35.120.
Enforcement of AS 18.35.100.

The department shall adopt regulations to implement and enforce AS

18.35.100

by appropriate means. The regulations must set standards of sanitation and must provide for, but need not be limited to, periodic inspections. However, the regulations may not require a restaurant or tavern to have more than one toilet accommodation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 58 SLA 1974; am § 2 ch 78 SLA 1976; am § 21 ch 30 SLA 1992)

Administrative Code. —

For public toilets, showers, and laundromats, see 18 AAC 30, art. 6.

For sanitation and physical facilities, see 18 AAC 31, art. 5.

Sec. 18.35.200.
Free toilet facilities required for public facilities and special events.

An owner of public facilities or sponsor of special events open to the general public shall, where practical, provide and maintain at the facilities or events sanitary toilet accommodations for public use whether the facilities or events are permanent or temporary. A charge may not be required for use of a toilet facility in any public place.

History.

(§ 1 ch 58 SLA 1974; am § 46 ch 59 SLA 1982)

Administrative Code. —

For temporary food service, limited food service, kiosks, mobile food units, see 18 AAC 31, art. 6.

Sec. 18.35.210.
Penalty for violation of AS 18.35.200.

A person who fails to comply with AS

18.35.200

is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction is punishable by a fine of not more than $500.
Each day of operation is a separate offense.

History.

(§ 1 ch 58 SLA 1974)

Sec. 18.35.220.
Enforcement of AS 18.35.200.

The department shall adopt regulations to implement and enforce AS

18.35.200

by appropriate means, including but not limited to periodic inspections.

History.

(§ 1 ch 58 SLA 1974)

Administrative Code. —

For public toilets, showers, and laundromats, see 18 AAC 30, art. 6.

For temporary food service, limited food service, kiosks, mobile food units, see 18 AAC 31, art. 6.

Sec. 18.35.230.
Definitions.

In
AS

18.35.100

—

18.35.230

,

“department” means the Department of Environmental Conservation;

“public facilities” means recreation camps, picnic areas, theaters, places of entertainment, churches, fair buildings, and places with permanent facilities for public use;

“restaurant” means a place maintained or held out to the public for purposes of sale and on-premise consumption of food or beverages;

“special events” means events involving public gathering and includes athletic and sporting events where the public congregates, including but not be limited to dog sled racing, horse racing, snowmobile races, skiing events, salmon derbies, and other activities;

“tavern” means a place maintained or held out to the public for purposes of sale and on-premise consumption of alcoholic beverages;

“toilet accommodations” means a facility available to the public consisting of an approved flush-type commode, urinal, privy, self-contained privy, or any other device approved by the department for containment and disposal of human wastes, and shall include lavatory facilities where practical.

History.

(§ 1 ch 58 SLA 1974; am § 3 ch 78 SLA 1976; am E.O. No. 51, § 36 (1981); am § 38 ch 30 SLA 1992)

Revisor’s notes. —

Reorganized in 1986 and 2012 to alphabetize the defined terms.